Wisconsin, session 2025, AB245.
do enact as follows:AB245,11Section 1. 238.40 (1) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB245,2,52238.40 (1) (b) (intro.) “Qualified Except as provided in par. (bm), “qualified 3data center” means one or more buildings or an array of connected buildings owned, 4leased, or operated by the same business entity, as defined in s. 13.62 (5), or its 5affiliate and for which all of the following apply:AB245,26Section 2. 238.40 (1) (b) 1. of the statutes is renumbered 238.40 (1) (b) 1. 7(intro.) and amended to read:AB245,2,108238.40 (1) (b) 1. (intro.) The buildings are rehabilitated or constructed to 9house a group of individual or networked server computers in one physical location 10or multiple locations in order to do any of the following:AB245,3,21a. Allow an owner, operator, or tenant to centralize the processing, storage, 2management, retrieval, communication, or dissemination of data and information.AB245,33Section 3. 238.40 (1) (b) 1. b. of the statutes is created to read:AB245,3,74238.40 (1) (b) 1. b. Provide an owner, operator, or tenant the opportunity to 5rent or own space, utilities, and other vital resources such as cooling capacity, 6enhanced security features, or the ability to procure infrastructure, platforms, 7software, and other managed services.AB245,48Section 4. 238.40 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB245,3,119238.40 (1) (bm) “Qualified data center” does not include buildings used for or 10to facilitate the creation of cryptocurrencies and the process used to verify and 11secure cryptocurrency transactions and blockchains.AB245,512Section 5. Effective date.AB245,3,1413(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 14publication.AB245,3,1515